California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(i) On or before March 1, 2016, and on or before March 1 each year thereafter, the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration shall multiply the amount applicable for the current fiscal year by the inflation factor adjustment calculated based on the percentage change in the Consumer Price Index, as recorded by the California Department of Industrial Relations for the most recent year available, and the formula set forth in paragraph (2) of subdivision (h) of Section 17041. The resulting amount will be the applicable amount for the succeeding fiscal year only when the applicable amount computed is equal to or exceeds a new
 operative threshold, as defined in subparagraph (B).

(ii) When the applicable amount equals or exceeds an operative threshold specified in subparagraph (B), the resulting applicable amount, rounded to the nearest multiple of one hundred dollars ($100), shall be operative for purposes of paragraph (1) beginning July 1 of the succeeding fiscal year.

(B) For purposes of this paragraph, “operative threshold” means an amount that exceeds by at least one hundred dollars ($100) the greater of either the amount specified in paragraph (1) or the amount computed pursuant to subparagraph (A) as the operative adjustment to the amount specified in paragraph (1).

(c) The California Department of Tax and Fee Administration shall not sell any seized property until it has first notified the feepayer in writing of the exemptions from
 levy under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 703.010) of Division 2 of Title 9 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(d) Except as provided in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), this section shall not apply to the seizure of any property as a result of a jeopardy determination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 181, Sec. 8.   (SB 1507)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

45868.5.

(a) Except in any case where the board finds collection of the tax to be in jeopardy, if any property has been levied upon, the property or the proceeds from the sale of the property shall be returned to the taxpayer if the board determines any one of the following:

(1) The levy on the property was not in accordance with the law.

(2) The taxpayer has entered into and is in compliance with an installment
 payment agreement pursuant to Section 45609 to satisfy the tax liability for which the levy was imposed, unless that or another agreement allows for the levy.

(3) The return of the property will facilitate the collection of the tax liability or will be in the best interest of the state and the taxpayer.

(b) Property returned under paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) is subject to the provisions of Section 45870.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 929, Sec. 57.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

45869.

Exemptions from levy under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 703.010) of Division 2 of Title 9 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure shall be adjusted for purposes of enforcing the collection of debts under this part to reflect changes in the California Consumer Price Index whenever the change is more than 5 percent higher than any previous adjustment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 589, Sec. 172.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

45870.

(a) A feepayer may file a claim with the board for reimbursement of bank charges and any other reasonable third-party check charge fees incurred by the feepayer as the direct result of an erroneous levy or notice to withhold, erroneous processing action, or erroneous collection action by the board. Bank and third-party charges include a financial institution’s or third party’s customary charge for
 complying with the levy or notice to withhold instructions and reasonable charges for overdrafts that are a direct consequence of the erroneous levy or notice to withhold, erroneous processing action, or erroneous collection action. The charges are those paid by the feepayer and not waived or reimbursed by the financial institution or third party. Each claimant applying for reimbursement shall file a claim with the board that shall be in a form as may be prescribed by the board. In order for the board to grant a claim, the board shall determine that both of the following conditions have been satisfied:

(1) The erroneous levy or notice to withhold, erroneous processing action, or erroneous collection action was caused by board error.

(2) Prior to the erroneous levy or notice to withhold, erroneous processing action, or erroneous collection action, the feepayer responded to all
 contacts by the board and provided the board with any requested information or documentation sufficient to establish the feepayer’s position. This provision may be waived by the board for reasonable cause.

(b) Claims pursuant to this section shall be filed within 90 days from the date the bank and third-party charges were incurred by the feepayer. Within 30 days from the date the claim is received, the board shall respond to the claim. If the board denies the claim, the feepayer shall be notified in writing of the reason or reasons for the denial of the claim.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 253, Sec. 8.   (SB 442)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

45871.

(a) At least 30 days prior to the filing or recording of liens under Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 7150) or Chapter 14.5 (commencing with Section 7220) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the department shall mail to the fee payer a preliminary notice. The notice shall specify the statutory authority of the department for filing or recording the lien, indicate the earliest date on which the lien may be filed or recorded, and state the remedies available to the fee payer to prevent the filing or recording of the lien. In the event fee liens are filed for the same liability in multiple counties, only one preliminary notice shall be sent.

(b) The preliminary notice required by this section shall not be
 required with respect to jeopardy determinations issued under Article 4 (commencing with Section 45351) of Chapter 3.

(c) If the department determines that the filing of a lien was in error, it shall mail a release to the fee payer and the entity recording the lien as soon as possible, but no later than seven days, after this determination and receipt of lien recording information. The release shall contain a statement that the lien was filed in error. In the event the erroneous lien is obstructing a lawful transaction, the department shall immediately issue a release of lien to the fee payer and the entity recording the lien.

(d) When the department releases a lien that has been erroneously filed, notice of that release shall be mailed to the fee payer and, upon the request of the fee payer, a copy of the release shall be mailed to the major credit reporting companies in the
 county where the lien was filed.

(e) (1) The department may release or subordinate a lien if the department determines any of the following:

(A) Release or subordination will facilitate the collection of the fee liability.

(B) Release or subordination will be in the best interest of the state and the fee payer.

(C) Release or subordination will be in the best interest of the state and another person that is not the taxpayer but that holds an interest with the taxpayer in the property that is subject to the lien. 

(2) The amendments added to this subdivision do not constitute a change in, and are declaratory of, existing law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 474, Sec. 80.   (SB 1496)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

45872.

(a) If any officer or employee of the board recklessly disregards board-published procedures, a fee payer aggrieved by that action or omission may bring an action for damages against the State of California in superior court.

(b) In any action brought under subdivision (a), upon finding of liability on the part of the State of California, the state shall be liable to the plaintiff in an amount equal to the sum of all of the following:

(1) Actual and direct monetary damages sustained by the plaintiff as a result of the actions or omissions.

(2) Reasonable litigation costs, including any of the following:

(A) Reasonable court costs.

(B) Prevailing market rates for the kind or quality of services furnished in connection with any of the following:

(i) The reasonable expenses of expert witnesses in connection with the civil proceeding, except that no expert witness shall be compensated at a rate in excess of the highest rate of compensation for expert witnesses paid by the State of California.

(ii) The reasonable cost of any study, analysis, engineering report,
 test, or project that is found by the court to be necessary for the preparation of the party’s case.

(iii) Reasonable fees paid or incurred for the services of attorneys in connection with the civil proceeding, except that those fees shall not be in excess of seventy-five dollars ($75) per hour unless the court determines that an increase in the cost of living or a special factor, such as the limited availability of qualified attorneys for the proceeding, justifies a higher rate.

(c) In the awarding of damages under subdivision (b), the court shall take into consideration the negligence or omissions, if any, on the part of the plaintiff that contributed to the damages.

(d) Whenever it appears to the court that the fee payer’s position in the proceeding brought under subdivision (a) is frivolous, the court may impose
 a penalty against the plaintiff in an amount not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000). A penalty so imposed shall be paid upon notice and demand from the board and shall be collected as a tax imposed under this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 634.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Disposition of Proceeds [45901. - 45901.]

45901.

All fees, interest, and penalties imposed and all amounts of fee required to be paid to the state pursuant to Section 45051 shall be paid to the board in the form of remittances payable to the State Board of Equalization of the State of California. The board shall transmit the payments in the following manner:

(a) The payments from the fees paid pursuant to
 paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 48000 of the Public Resources Code and related interest and penalties shall be transmitted to the Treasurer for deposit in the Integrated Waste Management Account in the Integrated Waste Management Fund.

(b) The payments from the fees paid pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 48000 of the Public Resources Code and related interest and penalties shall be transmitted to the State Solid Waste Postclosure and Corrective Action Trust Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 318, Sec. 5.   (AB 274)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Violations [45951. - 45956.]

45951.

Any person who refuses to furnish any return or report required to be made, or who refuses to furnish a supplemental return or other data required by the board, is guilty of a misdemeanor and subject to a fine not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500) for each offense.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1319, Sec. 6.   Effective September 28, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

45952.

Any person who knowingly or willfully files a false return or report with the board, and any person who refuses to permit the board or any of its representatives to make any inspection or examination for which provision is made in this part, or who fails to keep any records as prescribed by the board, or who fails to preserve the records for the inspection of the board for such time as the board deems necessary, or who alters, cancels, or obliterates entries in the records for the purpose of falsifying the records is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) or more than
 one thousand dollars ($1,000), by imprisonment in the county jail for not less than one month or more than six months, or by both.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1319, Sec. 6.   Effective September 28, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

45953.

Any person who willfully evades or attempts in any manner to evade or defeat the payment of the fee imposed by this part is guilty of a felony.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1319, Sec. 6.   Effective September 28, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

45954.

Every person convicted for a violation of any provision of this part for which another penalty or punishment is not specifically provided for in this part is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500), by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six months, or by both.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1319, Sec. 6.   Effective September 28, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

45955.

Every person convicted of a felony for a violation of any provision of this part for which another punishment is not specifically provided for in this part shall be punished by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 586.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

45956.

Any prosecution for violation of any provision of this part shall be instituted within three years after the commission of the offense.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1319, Sec. 6.   Effective September 28, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Disclosure of Information [45981. - 45984.]

45981.

(a) The board shall provide any information obtained under this part to the Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery.

(b) The Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery and the board may utilize any information obtained pursuant to this part to develop data on the generation or disposal of solid waste within the state.
 Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery may make waste generation and disposal data available to the public.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 654, Sec. 26.   (SB 1494)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

45982.

Neither the Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery, nor any person having an administrative duty under Part 9 (commencing with Section 15600) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code shall disclose the business affairs, operations, or any other proprietary information pertaining to a fee payer, except a fee payer which is a public agency, which was submitted to the board in a report or return required by this
 part, or permit any report or copy thereof or any book containing any abstract or particulars thereof to be seen or examined by any person not expressly authorized by Section 45981 or this section. However, the Governor may, by general or special order, authorize examination of the records maintained by the board under this part by other state officers, by officers of another state, by the federal government if a reciprocal arrangement exists, or by any other person. The information so obtained pursuant to the order of the Governor shall not be made public except to the extent and in the manner that the order may authorize that it be made public.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 654, Sec. 27.   (SB 1494)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

45983.

Notwithstanding Section 45982, the successors, receivers, trustees, executors, administrators, assignees, and guarantors, if directly interested, may be given information regarding the determination of any unpaid fee or the amount of fees, interest, or penalties required to be collected or assessed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1319, Sec. 6.   Effective September 28, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

45984.

Nothing in this chapter limits or increases public access to information on any aspect of solid waste generation or disposal collected pursuant to other state or local laws, regulations, or ordinances.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1319, Sec. 6.   Effective September 28, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 24. OIL SPILL RESPONSE, PREVENTION, AND ADMINISTRATION FEES [46001. - 46751.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions and Definitions [46001. - 46029.]

46001.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the Oil Spill Response, Prevention, and Administration Fees Law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 300, Sec. 6.   Effective August 1, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

46001.5.

(a) The California Department of Tax and Fee Administration may adopt regulations relating to the administration and enforcement of this part pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(b) An emergency regulation adopted pursuant to amendments made to this part by Senate Bill 861 of the 2013–14 Regular Session or by Assembly Bill 148 of the 2021–22 Regular Session
 shall be deemed an emergency and necessary to avoid serious harm to the public peace, health, safety, or general welfare for the purposes of Sections 11346.1 and 11349.6 of the Government Code, and the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration is hereby exempt from the requirement that it describe facts showing the need for immediate action and from review by the Office of Administrative Law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 115, Sec. 83.   (AB 148)   Effective July 22, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

46002.

The collection and administration of the fees referred to in Sections 46051 and 46052 shall be governed by the definitions contained in Chapter 7.4 (commencing with Section 8670.1) of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code and this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 35, Sec. 158.   (SB 861)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

46003.

Except where the context otherwise requires, the definitions contained in this chapter govern the construction of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 300, Sec. 6.   Effective August 1, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

46004.

The provisions of this part, insofar as they are substantially the same as existing provisions of law relating to the same subject matter, shall be construed as restatements and continuations and not as new enactments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 300, Sec. 6.   Effective August 1, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

46005.

Any action or proceeding commenced before this part takes effect, or any right accrued, is not affected by this part, but all procedures taken shall conform to the provisions on this part as far as possible.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 300, Sec. 6.   Effective August 1, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

46006.

“Administrator” means the person appointed by the Governor pursuant to Section 8670.4 of the Government Code to implement the Lempert-Keene-Seastrand Oil Spill Prevention and Response Act (Chapter 7.4 (commencing with Section 8670.1) of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 35, Sec. 159.   (SB 861)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

46007.

“Barge” means a vessel carrying oil, petroleum products, or renewable fuel in commercial quantities as cargo but are not equipped with a means of self-propulsion.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 115, Sec. 84.   (AB 148)   Effective July 22, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

46008.

“Barrel” means 42 gallons of crude oil, petroleum products, or renewable fuel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 115, Sec. 85.   (AB 148)   Effective July 22, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

46009.

“Board” or “department” means the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 95.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

46010.

“Crude oil” means petroleum in an unrefined or natural state, including condensate and natural gasoline, and including substances that enhance, cut, thin, or reduce viscosity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 35, Sec. 162.   (SB 861)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

46011.

(a) “Facility” means any of the following located in state waters or located where an oil spill may impact state waters:

(1) A building, structure, installation, or equipment used in oil exploration, oil well drilling operations, oil production, oil refining, oil storage, oil gathering, oil processing, oil transfer, oil distribution, or oil transportation.

(2) A marine terminal.

(3) A pipeline that transports oil.

(4) A railroad that transports oil as cargo.

(5) A drill ship, semisubmersible drilling platform, jack-up type drilling rig, or any other floating or temporary drilling platform.

(6) A renewable fuel production facility.

(7) A renewable fuel receiving facility.

(b) “Facility” does not include any of the following:

(1) A vessel, except a vessel located and used for any purpose described in paragraph (5) of subdivision (a).

(2) An owner or operator subject to Chapter 6.67 (commencing with Section 25270) of or Chapter 6.75 (commencing with Section 25299.10) of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code.

(3) Operations on a farm, nursery, logging site, or construction site that are either of the following:

(A) Do not exceed 20,000 gallons in a single storage tank.

(B) Have a useable tank storage capacity not exceeding 75,000 gallons.

(4) A small craft refueling dock.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 115, Sec. 86.   (AB 148)   Effective July 22, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

46012.

“Designated amount” means an amount equal to one hundred nine million seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($109,750,000), subject to the following:

(a) Fifty-four million eight hundred seventy-five thousand dollars ($54,875,000) shall be retained in the Oil Spill Response Trust Fund as cash.

(b) Fifty-four million eight hundred seventy-five thousand dollars ($54,875,000) shall be accessible in the Oil Spill Response Trust Fund in
 the form of financial security obtained by the Treasurer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 362, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

46013.

“Feepayer” means any person liable for the payment of a fee imposed by either Section 8670.40 or 8670.48 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 35, Sec. 165.   (SB 861)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

46017.

“Marine terminal” means any facility used for transferring crude oil, petroleum products, or renewable fuel to or from tankers or barges. For purposes of this part, a marine terminal includes all piping not integrally connected to a tank facility as defined in subdivision (n) of Section 25270.2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 115, Sec. 87.   (AB 148)   Effective July 22, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

46020.

“Person” means any individual, trust, firm, joint stock company, or corporation, including, but not limited to, a government corporation, partnership, limited liability company, and association. “Person” also includes any city, county, city and county, district, and the state or any department or agency thereof, and the federal government, or any department or agency thereof, to the extent permitted by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1200, Sec. 76.   Effective September 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

46021.

“Petroleum products” means any liquid hydrocarbon at atmospheric temperature and pressure that is the product of the fractionation, distillation, or other refining or processing of crude oil and that is used as, useable as, or may be refined as, a fuel or fuel blendstock, including, but not limited to, gasoline, diesel fuel, aviation fuel, bunker fuel, and renewable fuels containing more than 5 percent of petroleum products.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 115, Sec. 88.   (AB 148)   Effective July 22, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

46022.

“Pipeline” means any pipeline used at any time to transport crude oil or petroleum products.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 300, Sec. 6.   Effective August 1, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

46023.

“Refinery” means a facility that refines crude oil, including condensate and natural gasoline, into petroleum products, lubricating oils, coke, or asphalt, and that may blend nonpetroleum products with the refined products either in the refinery or as the petroleum products are shipped from the refinery or from adjacent storage facilities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 115, Sec. 89.   (AB 148)   Effective July 22, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

46024.

(a) “Renewable fuel” means any liquid produced from nonpetroleum renewable resources that is used or useable as a fuel, or such liquid that may be blended with other types of fuels. Renewable fuel includes fuels that may contain up to 5 percent petroleum product.

(b) “Renewable fuel production facility” means a facility that produces renewable fuel for blending or shipment.

(c) “Renewable fuel receiving facility” means a facility that is the first point of receipt of renewable fuel in the state that originated from outside the state that receives renewable fuel delivered by railroad tank car, tank truck,
 pipeline, or vessel. A renewable fuel receiving facility may include, but is not limited to, a refinery, a marine terminal, a rail tank car to tank truck transfer facility, or other storage and distribution facility.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 115, Sec. 90.   (AB 148)   Effective July 22, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

46025.

“Ship,” “shipment,” or “shipped” means any physical transfer of renewable fuel from a renewable fuel production facility. However, renewable fuel is not shipped when it evaporates or is otherwise lost or destroyed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 115, Sec. 91.   (AB 148)   Effective July 22, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

46027.

“State waters” or “waters of the state” means any surface water, including saline waters, marine waters, and freshwaters, within the boundaries of the state but does not include groundwater.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 35, Sec. 177.   (SB 861)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

46028.

“Tanker” means a self-propelled waterborne vessel, constructed or adapted for the carriage of oil in bulk or in commercial quantities as cargo.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 115, Sec. 92.   (AB 148)   Effective July 22, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

46029.

“Vessel” means a tanker or barge as defined in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 300, Sec. 6.   Effective August 1, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Oil Spill Prevention and Administration Fee and Oil Spill Response Fee [46051. - 46101.]



  ARTICLE 1. Imposition of Fee [46051. - 46054.]

46051.

The fee imposed pursuant to Section 8670.40 of the Government Code shall be administered and collected by the board in accordance with this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 300, Sec. 6.   Effective August 1, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

46052.

The fee imposed pursuant to Section 8670.48 of the Government Code shall be administered and collected by the board in accordance with this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 300, Sec. 6.   Effective August 1, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

46053.

Any fees collected from an owner of crude oil, petroleum products, or renewable fuel pursuant to Section 46051 or 46052 that have not been remitted to the
 California Department of Tax and Fee Administration shall be deemed a debt owed to the State of California by the person required to collect and remit fees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 115, Sec. 93.   (AB 148)   Effective July 22, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

46054.

(a) The board shall notify the feepayers that, as of the first of the month following the notification, no fee shall be imposed whenever the administrator, in consultation with the board, and with the approval of the Treasurer, determines that the amount in the Oil Spill Response Trust Fund, collected pursuant to Section 46052, is equal to the amount specified in subdivision (a) of Section 46012, and the collection of the fee is not required for any of the following purposes:

 (1) The purposes specified in subdivision (k) of Section 8670.48 of the Government Code.

(2) To repay any draw on a financial security obtained by the Treasurer pursuant to subdivision (o) of Section 8670.48 of the Government Code, including any principal, interest, premium, fees, charges, or costs of any kind incurred in connection with that financial security.

(3) To repay any borrowing by the Treasurer pursuant to Article 7.5 (commencing with Section 8670.53.1) of Chapter 7.4 of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code, including any principal, interest, premium, fees, charges, or costs of any kind incurred in connection with that borrowing.

(b) Whenever the fee has ceased to be imposed in accordance with subdivision (a), the administrator may direct the board to resume collection of the fee, if
 the administrator, in consultation with the board, pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (f) of Section 8670.48 of the Government Code, makes one of the following determinations:

 (1) The amount in the Oil Spill Response Trust Fund is less than or equal to 95 percent of the amount specified in subdivision (a) of Section 46012.

 (2) Additional money is required for the purposes specified in subdivision (k) of Section 8670.48 of the Government Code.

(3) That revenue is necessary to repay any draw on a financial security obtained by the Treasurer pursuant to subdivision (o) of Section 8670.48 of the Government Code or any borrowing by the Treasurer pursuant to Article 7.5 (commencing with Section 8670.53.1) of the Government Code, including any principal, interest, premium, fees, charges, or costs of any kind
 incurred in connection with those borrowings or that financial security.

(c) If the administrator directs the board to resume collection of the fee, the board shall notify the feepayers, upon the first of the month following the notification, that the fee will be imposed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 373, Sec. 19.   Effective October 10, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Registration [46101. - 46101.]

46101.

(a) Every person who operates a refinery in this state, a marine terminal in the state, or operates a pipeline to transport crude oil out of the state or petroleum products into the state shall register with the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration for the purposes of Section 8670.48 of the Government Code.

(b) Every person who operates a refinery in the state, a marine terminal in the state, a renewable fuel receiving facility in the state, or a renewable fuel production facility in the state shall register with the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration for the purposes of Section 8670.40 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 115, Sec. 94.   (AB 148)   Effective July 22, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Determinations [46151. - 46357.]



  ARTICLE 1. Returns and Payments [46151. - 46159.]

46151.

(a) The fees collected and administered under Sections 46051 and 46052 are due and payable to the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration monthly on or before the 25th day of the calendar month following the monthly period for which the fee is due. Each feepayer, on or before the 25th day of the month following each monthly period, shall file a return
 for the preceding monthly period, using electronic media, showing the information required to be reported by Sections 8670.40 and 8670.48 of the Government Code and any other information that the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration determines to be necessary to carry out this part. Returns shall be authenticated in a form, or pursuant to
 methods, as may be prescribed by the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration.

(b) The feepayer shall file the return, together with a remittance of the amount of fee due, if any, payable to the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration on or before the 25th day of the month following the monthly period for which the fee is due.

(c) In addition to the returns due pursuant to subdivision (a), each feepayer shall provide an annual information return, in the form as prescribed by the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration, which may include, but is not limited to, electronic media showing the information required to be reported by Section 8670.48 of the Government Code and any other information that the California Department of Tax and
 Fee Administration determines to be necessary to carry out this part. The feepayer shall deliver the return containing the required information for the preceding calendar year to the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration on or before February 1 of each year. Returns shall be authenticated in a form or pursuant to methods as may be prescribed by the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 115, Sec. 95.   (AB 148)   Effective July 22, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

46152.

The board, if it determines it necessary in order to facilitate the administration of this part, may require returns and payments specified under Section 46151 to be made for periods other than monthly.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 300, Sec. 6.   Effective August 1, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

46153.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the board, for good cause, may extend, for a period not to exceed one month, the time for making any return or paying any amount required to be paid under this part. The extension may be granted at any time if a request for the extension is filed with the board within or prior to the period for which the extension may be granted.

(b) (1) In the case of a disaster, the board, for a period not to exceed three months, may extend the time for making any report or return or paying any fee required under this part. The extension may be granted at any time provided a request therefor is filed with the board within or before the period for which the extension may be granted.

(2) For purposes of this section, “disaster” means fire, flood, storm, tidal wave, earthquake, or similar public calamity, whether or not resulting from natural causes.

(c) Any person to whom an extension is granted shall pay, in addition to the fee, interest at the modified adjusted rate per month, or fraction thereof, established pursuant to Section 6591.5 from the date on which the fee would have been due without the extension until the date of
 payment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 257, Sec. 11.   (AB 1559)   Effective September 9, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

46153.5.

(a) Subject to subdivision (c), if the Governor issues a state of emergency proclamation, the department may extend the time, for a period not to exceed three months, for making any report or return or paying any fee required under this part for any person in an area identified in the state of emergency proclamation.

(b) If the department makes an extension pursuant to subdivision (a), any person in an area identified in a state of emergency proclamation shall not be required to file a request for the extension. 

(c) The department may make the extension in subdivision (a) only during the first 12 months following the issuance of the state of emergency proclamation or the duration
 of the state of emergency, whichever is less.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 474, Sec. 81.   (SB 1496)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

46154.

(a) Any person who fails to pay any fee to the state or any amount of fee required to be collected and paid to the state, except amounts of determinations made by the board under Article 2 (commencing with Section 46201) or Article 3 (commencing with Section 46251), within the time required shall pay a penalty of 10 percent of the fee or amount of fee, in addition to the fee or amount of fee, plus interest at the modified adjusted rate per month, or fraction thereof, established pursuant to Section 6591.5, from the date on which the fee
 or the amount of fee required to be collected became due and payable to the state until the date of payment.

(b) Any feepayer who fails to file a return in accordance with the due date set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 46151 or the due date established by the board in accordance with Section 46152, shall pay a penalty of 10 percent of the amount of the fee with respect to the period for which the return is required.

(c) The penalties imposed by this section shall be limited to a maximum of 10 percent of the fee for which the return is required for any one return.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 923, Sec. 54.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

46154.1.

If the information return pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 46151 is not filed within the time prescribed, a penalty of five hundred dollars ($500) shall be assessed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 923, Sec. 54.5.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

46154.5.

(a) If the department finds, taking into account all facts and circumstances, that it is inequitable to compute interest at the modified adjusted rate per month or fraction thereof, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 6591.5, interest shall be computed at the modified adjusted daily rate from the date on which the fee was due until the date of payment, if all of the following occur:

(1) The payment of the fee was made one business day after the date the fee was due.

(2) The person was granted relief from all penalties that applied to that fee payment.

(3) The person files a request for an adjustment.

(b) For purposes of this section, “modified adjusted daily rate” means the modified adjusted rate per annum as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 6591.5 determined on a daily basis by dividing the modified adjusted rate per annum by 365.

(c) For purposes of this section, “business day” means any day other than a Saturday, Sunday, or any day designated as a state holiday.

(d) This section shall not apply to any payment made pursuant to a deficiency determination, a determination where no return has been filed, or a jeopardy determination issued by the
 department.
